test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_US_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kus - ENGLISH : # CLASS_US_STEM_2

     kus+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kuja
     kus+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kujáng
     kus+V+DIRECT+PAST: kuján
     kus+V+NON_FACTIVE: kujáng
     kus+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujáng
     kus+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujánggang
     kus+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kujángang
     kus+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kujíinii
     kus+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kujáangaa
     kus+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kujáangaan
     kus+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kujáng k̲asa'áa
     kus+V+NEAR+FUTURE: kujáng k̲asa'áang
     kus+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kujáng k̲asaasdláa
     kus+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kujáng k̲asaasdláang
     kus+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kuj'ahlánggang
     kus+V+CERTAIN+PAST: kuj'ahlánggan
     kus+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kuj'ahlánggiinii
     kus+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kuj'ahláns
     kus+V+REFLEXIVE: kuj'ahl
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujáng'waa
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujáng'waang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kujáng'waa.ang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujáng'anggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kujáng'angang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kujáng k̲asaa'áng
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kujáng k̲asaa'ánggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kujáng k̲asaasdlä'áng
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kujáng k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujáng'ang'waa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujáng'ang'waang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kujáng'ang'waa.ang
